New York, session 2025-2026, A10990.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 3032-a to read as follows: 3 § 3032-a. Rural ambulance services task force. 1. The department is 4 hereby authorized to establish the New York state rural ambulance 5 services task force within the bureau of emergency medical services to 6 examine, evaluate and make recommendations concerning New York state 7 ambulance services in rural areas. 8 2. (a) Such task force shall be comprised of individuals with exper- 9 tise in providing emergency medical services and/or providing medical 10 services in rural areas. The members shall be appointed as follows: 11 (i) two members appointed by the governor; 12 (ii) two members appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 13 (iii) two members appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 14 (iv) one member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 15 (v) one member appointed by the minority leader of the assembly; 16 (vi) two members appointed by the office of fire prevention and 17 control; 18 (vii) two members appointed by the bureau of emergency medical 19 services; and 20 (viii) two members appointed by the commissioner of labor. 21 (b) One of the appointments by the governor shall serve as chairperson 22 of the task force. 23 (c) The members of the task force shall serve for four years. Members 24 shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be allowed 25 their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their 26 services. 27 (d) The task force may collect and shall be provided all relevant 28 information necessary to carry out its functions from any relevant agen- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15383-01-6 A. 10990 2 1 cy. Members of the task force shall keep any information received in the 2 course of their duties confidential and shall only use such information 3 in the course of carrying out their duties on the task force. 4 3. Such task force shall conduct annual studies on the availability of 5 ambulance services in rural areas, with a particular focus on the unique 6 challenges they face and their ability to provide services. Utilizing 7 information obtained from such studies, the task force shall report and 8 provide recommendations in accordance with subdivision four of this 9 section, which shall include, but not be limited to the following: 10 (a) an analysis of the total number of ambulance services available in 11 rural areas of the state, provided by service type and geographic region 12 they serve and compared to the documented need for such services; 13 (b) assessing current reimbursement structures in place for ambulance 14 services as well as various methods to fund or otherwise raise revenue 15 for such services; 16 (c) assessing barriers that currently exist that may have led to a 17 shortage of available ambulance services to meet the need; and 18 (d) studying any other issue such task force deems relevant. 19 4. Within twelve months of the effective date of this section, and 20 annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report detailing the 21 findings of the study to the governor, the temporary president of the 22 senate, and the speaker of the assembly. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.